Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2714
Association; subject to examination and regulation; annual report.

The association shall be subject to examination and regulation by the director. The board of directors shall submit to the director, not later than May 1 of each year, a financial report for the preceding calendar year in a form approved by the director and a report of its activities during the preceding calendar year.

Laws 1975, LB 217, § 14.